District of Columbia statutes.
34-2301

Definitions.

For the purposes of this chapter, the term:

(1)

“Owner” means any individual, corporation, association, or partnership listed as the legal title holder of record.

(2)

“Rental property” means any real property consisting of 1 or more units that is leased or subleased to a person with the consent of the owner or the owner’s agent, in consideration for rental payment.

(3)

“Tenant” means any person who holds or possesses a habitation in subordination to the title of the owner of the premises in which the habitation is located, with the consent of the owner.

May 18, 1954, ch. 218, title XVIII, § 1801
as added June 13, 1990, D.C. Law 8-136, § 2(g), 37 DCR 2620
1981 Ed., § 43-1651.